Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Commission for the Blind, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,692,119 for operations  of
the commission.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,090,855 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Commission for
the Blind.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$17,774,408 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Commission for the
Blind.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5003 (HB 5003-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 27, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5003 (HB 5003-A) Page 2